California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(f) Any reports submitted by the department to the Legislature pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 20.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4519.4.

(a) Beginning in the summer of 2019, the State Department of Developmental Services shall consult with a broad and balanced group of stakeholders, including, but not limited to, representatives of the Developmental Services Task Force, the Rates Workgroup of the Developmental Services Task Force, legislative staff from the fiscal and relevant policy committees of the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, the Association of Regional Center Agencies, the State Council on Developmental Disabilities, the Department of Rehabilitation, and Disability Rights California to discuss system reforms, including fiscal reforms, to better serve consumers with developmental disabilities. The focus of this discussion shall be on how to create a sustainable, innovative, cost-effective, consumer-focused, and
 outcomes-based service delivery system.

(b) For purposes of implementing subdivision (a), the State Department of Developmental Services shall do all of the following:

(1) Consider a wide variety of perspectives of consumers, families, and service providers to discuss the potential outcomes associated with different approaches to system reform.

(2) Engage with consumers, families, and service providers across different geographic regions of the state, including urban and rural areas, and from diverse racial and ethnic backgrounds, consumer age groups, consumer diagnoses, and service categories.

(3) Identify key consumer outcomes and measurable targets to be achieved through these reforms, as informed by the stakeholder process.

(4) Evaluate compliance with federal rules relating to home- and community-based services, and how the department plans to redesign services that are not compliant with these rules.

(5) Discuss how feedback may be collected about the reforms, and how this information may be used to make changes to, and adapt, the system over time.

(c) The State Department of Developmental Services shall report on the progress of these efforts during the 2020–21 budget hearing process.

(d) By October 1, 2019, the State Department of Developmental Services shall post to its internet website a summary of public comments, departmental responses to those comments, and any appropriate and necessary changes to the rate models contained in the rate study, submitted pursuant to
 Section 4519.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 28, Sec. 9.   (SB 81)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4519.5.

(a) The department and the regional centers shall annually collaborate to compile and report, consistent with applicable federal and state privacy laws, data, including deidentified data in accordance with subdivision (m), in a uniform manner relating to purchase of service authorization, utilization, and expenditure by each regional center with respect to all of the following:

(1) The age of the consumer, categorized by the following:

(A) Birth to two years of age, inclusive.

(B) Three to 21 years of age, inclusive.

(C) Twenty-two years of age and older.

(2) Race or ethnicity of the consumer.

(3) Preferred language spoken by the consumer, and other related details, as feasible.

(4) Disability detail, in accordance with the categories established by subdivision (a) of Section 4512, and, if applicable, a category specifying that the disability is unknown.

(5) Residence type, subcategorized by age, race or ethnicity, and preferred language.

(6) Number of instances when the written copy of the individual program plan was provided at the
 request of the consumer and, when appropriate, the consumer’s parents, legal guardian or conservator, or authorized representative, in a language other than a threshold language, as defined by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1810.410 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations, if that written copy was provided more than 60 days after the request.

(7) Number of instances when the written copy of the individual program plan was provided at the request of the consumer and, when appropriate, the consumer’s parents, legal guardian or conservator, or authorized representative, in a threshold language, as defined by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1810.410 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations, if that written copy was provided more than 45 days after the request, in violation of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 4646.5.

(8) Beginning
 with data for the fiscal year of 2023–24, the numbers, percentages, and total and per capita expenditure and authorization amounts, by age, as applicable, according to race or ethnicity and preferred language, for all combined residence types and for consumers living in the family home, regarding the following service types:

(A) Camping and associated travel expenses.

(B) Social recreation activities.

(C) Educational services.

(D) Nonmedical therapies, including, but not limited to, specialized recreation, art, dance, and music.

(b) The data reported pursuant to subdivision (a) shall also include the number and percentage of individuals, categorized by age, race or ethnicity, and
 disability, and by residence type, as set forth in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), who have been determined to be eligible for regional center services, but are not receiving purchase of service funds.

(c) (1) (A) By March 31, 2013, each regional center shall post the data described in this section that are specific to the regional center on its website. Commencing on December 31, 2013, each regional center shall annually post these data by December 31. Each regional center shall maintain all previous years’ data on its website.

(B) Commencing December 31, 2023, each regional center shall post its data uniformly with all other regional centers,
 using the same criteria, format, and organization.

(2) Notwithstanding the requirement pursuant to paragraph (1), if the information required to be posted pursuant to this section is produced and posted by the department for each regional center, each regional center instead may link to that information from its internet website.

(d) By March 31, 2013, the department shall post the information described in this section on a statewide basis on its website. Commencing December 31, 2013, the department shall annually post this information by December 31. The department shall maintain all previous years’ data on its website. The department shall also post notice of any regional center stakeholder meetings on its website.

(e) In addition to maintaining hyperlinks to each regional center’s reports on its internet website, commencing December 1, 2024, the department shall also post the data compiled pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b), and the data compiled pursuant to Section 4519.6, in the same uniform manner as reported by the regional centers, as follows:

(1) On a statewide aggregate basis.

(2) On an aggregate basis according to particular geographical areas, as determined by the department in consultation with stakeholders.

(3) The department shall provide trend analysis on the changes observed in data over time, including increasing and decreasing utilization of services by any of the characteristics cited in subdivision (a).

(f) After December 1, 2024, the department and regional centers shall post information required to be posted pursuant to this section in machine-readable format.

(g) Within three months of compiling the data with the department, and annually thereafter, each regional center shall meet with stakeholders in one or more public meetings regarding the data. The meeting or meetings shall be held separately from any meetings held pursuant to Section 4660. The regional center shall provide participants of these meetings with the data and any associated information related to improvements in the provision of developmental services to underserved communities and shall conduct a discussion of the data and the associated information in a manner that is culturally and linguistically appropriate for that community, including providing alternative communication services, as
 required by Sections 11135 to 11139.7, inclusive, of the Government Code and implementing regulations. Regional centers shall inform the department of the scheduling of those public meetings 30 days prior to the meeting. Notice of the meetings shall also be posted on the regional center’s website 30 days prior to the meeting and shall be sent to individual stakeholders and groups representing underserved communities in a timely manner. Each regional center shall, in holding the meetings required by this subdivision, consider the language needs of the community and shall schedule the meetings at times and locations designed to result in a high turnout by the public and underserved communities.

(h) (1) Consistent with subdivision (h) of Section 4648, regional centers shall annually provide each individual with their purchase of services data
 and any associated information related to improvements in the provision of developmental services to them. If requested, regional centers shall conduct a discussion of the data and the associated information in a manner that is culturally and linguistically appropriate for that individual, including providing alternative communication services, as required by Sections 11135 to 11139.7, inclusive, of the Government Code and implementing regulations.

(2) When implemented in the statewide case management system, the information described in paragraph (1) shall be available to individuals through the consumer portal. If requested, regional centers shall conduct a discussion of the data and the associated information in a manner that is culturally and linguistically appropriate for that individual, including providing alternative communication
 services, as required by Sections 11135 to 11139.7, inclusive, of the Government Code and implementing regulations.

(i) (1) Each regional center shall annually report to the department regarding its implementation of the requirements of this section. The report shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Actions the regional center took to improve public attendance and participation at stakeholder meetings, including, but not limited to, attendance and participation by underserved communities.

(B) Copies of minutes from the meeting and attendee comments.

(C) Whether the data
 described in this section, including data deidentified pursuant to subdivision (m) of this section, indicate a need to reduce disparities in the purchase of services among consumers in the regional center’s catchment area. If the data do indicate that need, the regional center’s recommendations and plan to promote equity, and reduce disparities, in the purchase of services.

(2) Each regional center and the department shall annually post the reports required by paragraph (1) on its website by August 31.

(j) (1) The department shall, on a twice-a-year basis, consult with stakeholders, including consumers and families that reflect the ethnic and language diversity of regional center consumers, regional centers, advocates, providers, family resource centers, the protection and advocacy agency described in Section 4901, and those entities designated as University Centers for Excellence in Developmental Disabilities Education, Research, and Service pursuant to Section 15061 of Title 42 of the United States Code, to achieve the following objectives:

(A) Review the data compiled pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b).

(B) Identify barriers to equitable access to services and supports among consumers, including consumers whose purchase of services data have been deidentified pursuant to subdivision (m), and develop recommendations to help reduce disparities in purchase of service expenditures.

(C) Identify
 gaps in, and encourage the development and expansion of, culturally appropriate services, service delivery, and service coordination.

(D) Identify best practices to reduce disparity and promote equity.

(E) Maximize transparency whenever possible, including aggregation by region or display as percentages, as necessary.

(2) The department shall notify the Legislature when information is posted on its internet website pursuant to this section.

(k) (1) Subject to available funding, the department shall allocate funding to regional centers or community-based organizations with department oversight to assist with implementation of the recommendations and plans developed pursuant to subdivisions (i) and (j). Activities funded through these allocations may include, but are not limited to, pay differentials supporting direct care bilingual staff of community-based service providers, parent or caregiver education programs, cultural competency training for regional center staff, outreach to underserved populations, or additional culturally appropriate service types or service delivery models.

(2) Each regional center shall consult with stakeholders regarding activities that may be effective in addressing disparities in the receipt of regional center services and the regional center’s proposed requests for the funding specified in paragraph (1). Each regional center shall identify the stakeholders it consulted with, including groups whose purchase of services data have been deidentified, and include information on how it incorporated the input of stakeholders into its requests.

(3) A community-based organization may submit a request for grant funding pursuant to this subdivision. In order to protect confidential data, the department or a regional center may waive a grant application requirement to provide data supporting that application, if that data would be subject to deidentification pursuant to applicable federal or state privacy laws. The organization shall submit the request concurrently to the regional center of the jurisdiction in which the organization is located and to
 the department. The regional center shall provide the department with input regarding the request prior to the department’s final determination on the request.

(4) The department shall review requests for funding within 45 days from the deadline specified in the department’s guidance to regional centers and community-based organizations.

(5) Each regional center and community-based organization receiving funding shall report annually to the department, in a manner determined by the department, on how the funding allocations were used and shall include recommendations of priorities for activities that may be effective in addressing disparities, based on the consultation with stakeholders.

(6) The department shall post the following information on its website:

(A) By September 1 of any year in which grant funding is available and has not been allocated, a structure for the grant program, including all of the following information:

(i) How community-based organizations reflecting groups that are disadvantaged by disparities in the purchase of services will be invited to participate in the grant program, including groups whose purchase of services data have been deidentified.

(ii) How statewide strategies were considered.

(iii) How the department will ensure grant funds are not used for activities that regional centers are otherwise required by statute or regulation to conduct.

(iv) How funded activities will be evaluated.

(v) How community-based organizations reflecting groups that are impacted by disparities can receive a waiver for the submission of data supporting that application, if that
 data would be subject to deidentification pursuant to applicable federal or state privacy laws.

(B) By October 1 of any year in which grant funding is available and has not been allocated, the final invitation for requests for funding or another mechanism through which requests for funding are solicited.

(C) By January 1 of any year in which grant funding has been allocated, a list of grant recipients, funding level per grant, and a description of the funded project.

(D) By May 1 of any year in which the information is available, evaluation results from prior grants. To ensure the department complies with this subparagraph, regional centers and community-based organizations receiving funding shall provide the department, by March 1 of the same year, with an evaluation of funded activities and
 the effectiveness of those activities in reducing disparities in the purchase of services, to the extent information is available. The provision of data by community-based organizations reflecting groups that are impacted by disparities whose purchase of services data otherwise would have to be deidentified pursuant to applicable federal or state privacy laws may be waived for the purpose of reporting grant outcomes pursuant to this subdivision.

 (l) On or before December 31, 2021, the department shall contract with an entity or entities with demonstrated experience in quantitative and qualitative data evaluation to design and conduct an independent evaluation of the efforts to promote equity and reduce disparities pursuant to subdivision (k).

(m) (1) The data compiled pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be deidentified in accordance with Section 164.514 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations or with updated regulations regarding the deidentification of data in accordance with the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191) prior to that data being disclosed publicly to third parties, including, but not limited to, stakeholders, or posted on internet websites.

(2) The department
 shall deidentify purchase of services data pertaining to any regional center in a manner that maximizes transparency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.   (AB 121)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4519.6.

The department and the regional centers shall annually collaborate to determine the most appropriate methods to collect and compile meaningful data in a uniform manner, as specified in Section 4519.5, related to the payment of copayments, coinsurance, and deductibles by each regional center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 30, Sec. 14.   (SB 856)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4519.7.

(a) Any regional center employee shall not be liable for civil damages on account of an injury or death resulting from an employee’s act or omission where the act or omission was the result of the exercise of the discretion vested in him or her, in good faith, in carrying out the intent of this division, except for acts or omissions of gross negligence or acts or omissions giving rise to a claim under Section 3294 of the Civil Code. This section shall not be applied to provide immunity from liability for any criminal act.

(b) This section is not intended to change, alter, or affect the liability of regional centers, including, but not limited to, the vicarious liability of a regional center due to a negligent employee.

(c) A regional center employee, when participating in filing a complaint or providing information as required by law regarding a consumer’s health, safety, or well-being, or participating in a judicial proceeding resulting therefrom, shall be presumed to be acting in good faith, and unless the presumption is rebutted, shall be immune from any liability, civil or criminal, and shall be immune from any penalty, sanction, or restriction that might be incurred or imposed. The presumption established by this subdivision is a presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence.

(d) This section shall apply only to acts or
 omissions that occur on or after January 1, 2001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4519.8.

On or before March 1, 2019, the department shall submit a rate study to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature addressing the sustainability, quality, and transparency of community-based services for individuals with developmental disabilities. The department shall consult with stakeholders, through the developmental services task force process, in developing the study. The study shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) An assessment of the effectiveness of the methods used to pay each category of community service provider. This assessment shall include consideration of the following factors for each category of service provider:

(1) Whether the current
 method of ratesetting for a service category provides an adequate supply of providers in that category, including, but not limited to, whether there is a sufficient supply of providers to enable consumers throughout the state to have a choice of providers, depending upon the nature of the service.

(2) A comparison of the estimated fiscal effects of alternative rate methodologies for each service provider category.

(3) How different rate methodologies can incentivize outcomes for consumers.

(b) An evaluation of the number and type of service codes for regional center services, including, but not limited to, recommendations for simplifying and making service codes more reflective of the level and types of services provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 2.   (AB 1 2x)   Effective June 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4519.9.

(a) The department shall establish a community navigator program to promote the utilization of generic and regional center services by using community leaders, family members, or self-advocates to provide information and guidance to consumers and their families who could benefit from added support to navigate available resources.

(1) The program shall be structured to utilize individuals and families who are receiving or have received regional center services to provide education to those individuals who are or may be eligible for regional center services regarding the developmental disabilities services system, agencies available to assist them, and other available resources.

(2) The program shall focus on cultural and linguistic competency in supporting individuals and families to improve equitable access to regional center services.

(b) The department shall engage stakeholders to obtain input on key elements for the community navigator program by August 31, 2021.

(c) The department shall allocate funding to family resource centers to administer community navigator programs.

(1) To the extent possible, each funded program shall share a culture or ethnicity, or both, community, and language with the individuals and families they support when offering assistance and education to reduce barriers in accessing services.

(2) Each program funded pursuant to this subdivision shall assist individuals and families in
 accessing and utilizing generic and regional center services in their communities, including, but not limited to, assistance in building trust with regional center staff, education on available services, guidance on how to request needed services, and support from peers in the community who have experience with the regional center system.

(d) The department shall issue funding guidelines regarding the selection of community navigator programs and the conditions under which the funding shall be used consistent with the requirements of this section. The guidelines shall be exempt from the rulemaking process of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) A family resource center receiving funding for the purpose of the community navigator program shall report to the department in a manner and within a time period determined
 and outlined in guidance by the department on how the funding allocations were used and shall include recommendations of priorities for activities that may be effective in addressing disparities, including removing barriers to accessing and utilizing generic and regional center services. The department shall post these reports on its internet website by November 1, 2022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 24.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4519.10.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The current service provider rate structure in the system administered by the State Department of Developmental Services lacks transparency, remains complex, is not tied to person-centered outcomes, and varies across providers who provide the same service in the same region.

(2) In 2016, the Legislature funded a rate study to address the sustainability, quality, and transparency of community-based services for individuals with developmental disabilities.

(3) The department, with the help of a consultant, completed the rate study in 2019 and subsequently submitted the
 study’s findings and recommendations to the Legislature. Among other things, the study recommended all of the following:

(A) Within each service category, rate models that include components that may be regularly updated.

(B) Regional differentials to account for regional variance in the cost of living and doing business.

(C) Enhanced rates for services delivered in other languages, including American Sign Language.

(D) An optional add-on for direct service professional levels and wage differentials based on training and demonstrated competency.

(E) The consolidation of certain service codes.

(4) The rate study’s fiscal
 impact analysis indicated that full implementation of these rate models would cost an additional one billion one hundred million dollars ($1,100,000,000) from the General Fund, or one billion eight hundred million dollars ($1,800,000,000) of total funds, in the 2019–20 fiscal year.

(5) The recommendations from the rate study and the associated rate models have not been implemented, even as rate study findings informed supplemental rate increases for many service categories in the 2019–20 fiscal year and three additional service categories in the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(6) For Medi-Cal eligible consumers, the department receives federal Medicaid reimbursements to support home- and community-based services provided to those consumers.

(7) Direct service professionals employed by service providers are critical to the
 quality and provision of services and supports to individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

(8) A prevailing need and challenge within the developmental services system is moving from a compliance-based system to an outcomes-based system. Outcome measures must reinforce the system’s core values of meeting individual needs based on person-centered planning. The implementation of rates, pursuant to this section, should support this person-centered transformation through consideration of incentive payments, alternative payment models, alternative service delivery, lessons learned from the COVID-19 pandemic period, person-centered and culturally and linguistically sensitive and competent approaches, training of direct service professionals, compliance with the federal home- and community-based services rule set to take effect on March 17, 2023, and methods for assessing and reporting outcomes.

(9) To improve consumer outcomes and experiences and measure overall system performance, four goals should guide rate reform:

(A) Consumer experience.

(B) Equity.

(C) Quality and outcomes.

(D) System efficiencies.

(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to phase in funding and policies beginning in the 2021–22 fiscal year to implement rate reform, which shall include a quality incentive program, create an enhanced person-centered, outcomes-based system, and complete this transformation by July 1, 2025.

(c) (1) (A) Commencing April 1, 2022, the department shall implement a rate increase for service providers that equals one-quarter of the difference between current rates and the fully funded rate model for each provider.

(B) Commencing January 1, 2023, and continuing through December 31, 2024, the department shall adjust rates to equal one-half of the difference between rates in effect March 31, 2022, and the fully funded rate model for each provider, and additional funding shall be available for the quality incentive program described in subdivision (e).

(i) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, it is the intent of the Legislature that the majority of the rate increase described in this subparagraph for the 2022–23 fiscal year be used for the purpose of enhancing wages and benefits for staff who spend a minimum of 75 percent of their time providing direct services to
 consumers.

(ii) Commencing January 1, 2023, a provider shall not spend a smaller percentage of the rate increase on direct care staff wages and benefit costs than the corresponding percentage included for direct care staff wages and benefit costs in the rate models for each specific service.

(iii) A provider granted a rate increase pursuant to this section shall maintain documentation, subject to audit by the department or regional center, that the portion of the rate increase identified in this subparagraph was used to increase wages, salaries, or benefits of eligible staff members spending a minimum of 75 percent of their time providing direct services to consumers at least at the same percentage as provided in the rate models.

(iv) For the purpose of this subparagraph, “direct services” are services, supports,
 care, supervision, or assistance provided by staff directly to a consumer to address the consumer’s needs, as identified in the individual program plan, and includes staff’s participation in training and other activities directly related to providing services to consumers, as well as program preparation functions as defined in Section 54302 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(v) Commencing July 1, 2023, a vendor shall be in compliance with the home- and community-based final rule, effective March 17, 2014, or implementing a corrective action plan, to be eligible for the quality incentive program described in subdivision (e).

(C) (i) Commencing January 1, 2025, the department shall implement the fully funded rate models. The fully funded rate models shall be implemented using two payment components, a base rate equaling 90 percent of the rate
 model, and a quality incentive payment, equaling up to 10 percent of the rate model, to be implemented through the quality incentive program described in subdivision (e).

(ii) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing July 1, 2024, the rate models shall be updated to account for the current and any subsequent changes to the statewide minimum wage, as established by Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, or other relevant statute.

(2) (A) Effective January 1, 2025, it is the intent of the Legislature that rates be uniform within service categories and adjusted for geographic cost differentials, including differentials in wages, the cost of travel, and the cost of real estate.

(B) Providers who were not identified as requiring a rate increase in the rate study are not eligible for rate adjustments
 pursuant to paragraph (1).

(d) (1) Beginning in the 2021–22 fiscal year, the department shall implement a hold harmless policy for providers whose rates exceed rate model recommendations. The policy shall freeze a provider’s existing rates until February 28, 2026, after which time the provider’s rates shall be adjusted to equal the rates for other providers in the provider’s service category and region.

(2) Beginning January 1, 2025, the department shall also implement a hold harmless policy for providers whose rates in effect on January 1, 2023, exceed 90 percent of the rate model. The policy shall freeze a provider’s base rate at the rate in effect on January 1, 2023, until February 28, 2026, after which time the provider’s base rates shall be adjusted to equal the base rates for other providers in the provider’s service category and region. The provider
 shall be eligible for a quality incentive payment that, when added to their base rate, equals the fully funded rate model.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), the department may adjust rates as a result of reviews or audits.

(e) In conjunction with implementing rate reform, the department shall implement a quality incentive program in order to improve consumer outcomes, service provider performance, and the quality of services.

(1) (A) The department shall, with input from stakeholders, develop quality measures or benchmarks, or both, for consumer outcomes and regional center and service provider performance. Given the time necessary to identify and develop the measures or benchmarks described in this paragraph, the department may establish quality measures or benchmarks, or both, in the
 initial years of the quality incentive program that focus on building capacity, developing reporting systems, gathering baseline data, and similar activities while working towards meaningful outcome measures at the individual consumer level for all services. Measures or benchmarks, or both, shall initially include process- and performance-related measures for service providers and, by the conclusion of the 2025–26 fiscal year, shall also evolve to include outcome measures at the individual consumer level. In developing the proposed measures or benchmarks, or both, the department shall do all of the following:

(i) Gather public input through regularly held public meetings that are accessible both virtually and by telephone. Public meeting agendas and meeting materials shall be posted at least three days in advance of any meeting and shared by various means, including internet website updates, focus groups, and other communication.

(ii) Provide documents, which may include, but are not limited to, updates, concept papers, interim reports, proposals, and performance and quality measures and benchmarks, and revisions to these materials, to the Legislature and post these materials on an internet website for public comment at least 30 days, as required by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, prior to submitting a request for federal funding.

(iii) Seek input from subject matter experts to understand options for outcomes-based system structures using person-centered planning and alternative payment models.

(B) (i) On or before April 1, 2022, proposed quality measures or benchmarks, or both, shall be provided to the Legislature and posted for public comment, as described in subparagraph (A). After the department has
 considered public comments and modified the proposed quality measures or benchmarks, or both, as needed, the measures or benchmarks, or both, shall be finalized and implemented in the 2022–23 fiscal year.

(ii) On or before April 1 of any subsequent year in which the department proposes new or revised quality measures or benchmarks, or both, the proposed measures or benchmarks, or both, shall be provided to the Legislature and posted for public comment, as described in subparagraph (A). After the department has considered public comments and modified the proposed quality measures or benchmarks, or both, as needed, the measures or benchmarks, or both, shall be finalized and implemented in the upcoming fiscal year.

(C) Beginning in the 2024–25 fiscal year, there will be opportunity for eligible providers to earn full quality incentive payments through one or more measures.

(D) Beginning in the 2026–27 fiscal year, a provider shall be compliant with electronic visit verification, home- and community-based services rules, and applicable annual fiscal reviews and audit requirements as a condition of eligibility for the quality incentive program.

(2) (A) The department shall develop a quality incentive payment structure for providers meeting the quality measures or benchmarks, or both, developed pursuant to paragraph (1). The department shall issue written directives to define the way quality incentive payments will be made to service providers based on quality measures or benchmarks, or both, developed and implemented under this subdivision.

(B) The department shall determine each provider’s quality incentive payment percentage prior to the start of the fiscal year,
 with the exception of the 2024–25 fiscal year, by measuring the provider’s performance against the quality measures or benchmarks for the most recently available reporting period. The department shall provide a written communication to the fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature that reports on the total amount of quality incentive payments estimated to be paid to providers pursuant to this section. This written communication shall be made as soon as is practicable, but no later than 60 days after the quality incentive payment percentages are determined and the providers are informed of their payments.

(f) On or before March 1, 2024, the department shall provide a status update to the Legislature regarding progress toward implementing rate reform and creating an enhanced person-centered, outcomes-based system. The status update may include, but is not limited to, information about all of the following:

(1) Additional changes that may be necessary to effectively implement rate reform, including adding and amending statutes, regulations, and other departmental policies.

(2) Compliance with rules of the federal Medicaid program, including the home- and community-based services final rule effective on March 17, 2014, and state compliance consistent with the current federal guidance, including all of the following:

(A) A definition of what it means to be compliant with the rules of the federal Medicaid program.

(B) Whether there are certain service categories that are unlikely to achieve compliance due to the structure of the service, and, if so, which categories this includes.

(C) Data about
 the total number of providers within each service category and the estimated number of providers that have not yet achieved compliance.

(3) Program and system improvement efforts made as a result of the state’s home- and community-based services additional federal funding, including the one-time investment implemented beginning in the 2021–22 state fiscal year, including a description of how the department will build on the investments.

(g) For purposes of this section, “rate model” means a rate model included in the rate study submitted to the Legislature pursuant to Section 4519.8.

(h) Operative through December 31, 2030, contracts and contract amendments to procure services to implement this section are exempt from the requirements
 of the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual, and from approval by the Department of General Services.

(i) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of written directives or similar instructions until regulations are adopted, which shall occur no later than
 December 31, 2030.

(j) Implementation of this section is contingent upon the approval of federal funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 21.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4519.11.
